Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Chapter 5. Court of Chancery

§§ 211-218.
Repealed.
1969, No. 129, § 5, eff. date, see note set out below.

§ 219.
Powers of chancellor.

The powers and jurisdiction of the courts that were previously vested in the courts of chancery are vested in the Superior Court. Superior, Environmental, and Probate judges have the powers of a chancellor in passing upon all civil matters which may come before them.

HISTORY:

1969, No. 129

, § 1, eff. date, see note set out below; amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1983, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 27, 1984;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, effective July 1, 2022.

§§ 220-222.
Repealed.
1979, No. 181 (Adj. Sess.), § 22.